Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8114.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-72-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-72 entitled "Department
of Children, Youth and Families" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-72-8. Confidentiality of records.
(a) Any records of the department pertaining to children and their families in need of
service pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; or for whom an application for services has been
made, shall be confidential and only disclosed as provided by law.
(b) Records may be disclosed when necessary:
(1) To individuals, or public or private agencies engaged in medical, psychological, or
psychiatric diagnosis or treatment or education of the person under the supervision of the
department;
(2) To individuals or public or private agencies for the purposes of temporary or permanent
placement of the person, and when the director determines that the disclosure is needed to
accomplish that placement, including any and all healthcare information obtained by the
department in accordance with the provisions of chapter 37.3 of title 5 and applicable federal laws
and regulations;
(3) When the director determines that there is a risk of physical injury by the person to
himself or herself or others, and that disclosure of the records is necessary to reduce that risk;
(4) To the family court, including periodic reports regarding the care and treatment of

children; provided, that if a child is represented by a guardian ad litem or attorney, a copy of the
family court report will be made available to the guardian ad litem or attorney prior to its
submission;
(5) To inform any person who made a report of child abuse or neglect pursuant to § 40-11-
3, whether services have been provided the child as a result of the report; provided, however, that
no facts or information shall be released pursuant to this subsection other than the fact that services
have been, or are being, provided;
(6) To permit access to computer records relating to child abuse and neglect investigations
by physicians who are examining a child when the physician believes that there is reasonable cause
to suspect that a child may have been abused or neglected;
(7) To the office of the department of attorney general, upon the request of the attorney
general or assistant attorney general, when the office is engaged in the investigation of, or
prosecution of, criminal conduct by another relating to the child or other children within the same
family unit;
(8) To the department of corrections in the case of an individual who has been transferred
to the jurisdiction of that department pursuant to the provisions of § 14-1-7.3 or § 14-1-7.1;
(9) To the office of the department of the attorney general, upon the request of the attorney
general or assistant attorney general, when the office is engaged in the investigation of, or
prosecution of, criminal conduct as defined in § 40-11-3.2;
(10) To individuals employed by a state or county child-welfare agency outside of Rhode
Island when the director determines that the information is needed to ensure the care, protection,
and/or treatment of any child; provided, however, any records relating to allegations previously
determined to be unfounded, unsubstantiated, or not indicated shall not be disclosed;
(11) Whenever a person previously under the supervision of the training school becomes
subject to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections as an adult offender, the director of
corrections, or the director's designee, shall receive, upon request, the portions of the person’s
training school records limited to the escape history, disciplinary record, and juvenile classification
history;
(12) In an administrative hearing held pursuant to § 42-35-9, the records, or exact copies
of the records, shall be delivered to the administrative hearing officer pursuant to a written request
by one of the parties, and shall be delivered to the party making the request or shall be reviewed in
camera by the administrative hearing officer for purposes of making a determination of relevancy
to the merits of the administrative matter pending before the hearing officer, as the hearing officer
may direct. If the records or a portion are relevant to the matter, those records may be viewed and/or
LC004877 - Page 2 of 6

copied by counsel of record, at the expense of the party requesting the records. The records shall
not be disseminated in any form beyond the parties, counsel of record and their agents, and any
experts, except as otherwise specifically authorized by the hearing officer, and provided further
that at the conclusion of the action, the records shall be sealed; and
(13) In a criminal or civil action, the records, or exact copies of the records, shall be
delivered to a court of proper jurisdiction pursuant to a subpoena duces tecum, properly issued by
one of the parties, and shall be delivered to the party issuing the subpoena, or shall be reviewed in
camera by the trial justice for purposes of making a determination of relevancy to the merits of the
civil or criminal action pending before the court, as the court may direct. If the records or a portion
are relevant to the civil or criminal action, those records may be viewed and/or copied by counsel
of record, at the expense of the party requesting the records. The court shall issue a protective order
preventing dissemination of the records in any form beyond the parties, counsel of record and their
agents, and any experts, except as otherwise specifically authorized by the court, and provided,
further, that at the conclusion of the action, all records shall be sealed.
(c) Disclosure required.
(1) The director shall notify the office of the child advocate verbally and electronically, in
writing, within 48 hours of a confirmed fatality or near fatality of a child who is the subject of a
DCYF case. The department shall provide the office of the child advocate with access to any written
material about the case. For purposes of this chapter, “near fatality” shall mean a child in serious
or critical condition as certified by a physician as a result of abuse, neglect, self-harm, or other
unnatural causes.
(2) The director shall make public disclosure of a confirmed fatality or near fatality of a
child who is the subject of a DCYF case within 48 hours of confirmation, provided disclosure of
such information is in general terms and does not jeopardize a pending criminal investigation.
(3) The director shall disclose to the office of the child advocate information, within five
(5) days of completion of the department’s investigation, when there is a substantiated finding of
child abuse or neglect that resulted in a child fatality or near fatality. The department may disclose
the same information to the office of the attorney general and other entities allowable under 42
U.S.C. § 5106a.
(4) The information that must be disclosed in accordance with subsection (c)(3) includes:
(i) A summary of the report of abuse or neglect and a factual description of the contents of
the report;
(ii) The date of birth and gender of the child;
(iii) The date that the child suffered the fatality or near fatality;
LC004877 - Page 3 of 6

(iv) The cause of the fatality or near fatality, if such information has been determined;
(v) Whether the department of children, youth and families, or a court-appointed special
advocate, had any contact with the child before the fatality or near fatality and, if so:
(A) The frequency of any contact or communication with the child or a member of the
child’s family or household before the fatality or near fatality and the date on which the last contact
or communication occurred before the fatality or near fatality;
(B) Whether the department provided any child welfare services to the child, or to a
member of the child’s family or household, before, or at the time of, the fatality or near fatality;
(C) Whether the department made any referrals for child welfare services for the child, or
for a member of the child’s family or household, before or at the time of the fatality or near fatality;
(D) Whether the department took any other action concerning the welfare of the child
before or at the time of the fatality or near fatality; and
(E) A summary of the status of the child’s case at the time of the fatality or near fatality,
including, without limitation, whether the child’s case was closed by the department before the
fatality or near fatality and if so, the reasons why the case was closed; and
(vi) Whether the department, in response to the fatality or near fatality:
(A) Has provided, or intends to provide and/or make, a referral for child welfare services
to the child, or to a member of the child’s family or household; and
(B) Has taken, or intends to take, any other action concerning the welfare and safety of the
child, or any member of the child’s family or household.
(5) The director shall disclose to the school nurse where a child is enrolled, when that child
has been placed in foster care.
(d) If a public panel is convened or established by the department to evaluate the extent to
which the department is discharging its child-protection responsibilities, the panel, or any of its
members or staff, shall not disclose identifying information about a specific child protection case,
nor make public any identifying information provided by the department, except as may be
authorized by law. Any person who violates this subsection shall be subject to civil sanctions as
provided by law.
(e) If a public panel is convened or established by the department, this panel, in the course
of its evaluation, may review, but shall not investigate, any child fatality that is under the
jurisdiction of the child advocate in accordance with the provisions of § 42-73-7(2).
(f) In the event records and information contained within DCYF records are shared with
individuals or public or private agencies as specified in subsection (b) above, any such individual,
and/or public or private agency, shall be advised that the shared information cannot be further
LC004877 - Page 4 of 6

disclosed, except as specifically provided for under applicable federal and/or state law and
regulation. Any individual and/or public or private agency who or that violates this subsection shall
be subject to civil sanctions as provided in chapter 37.3 of title 5, and any other federal or state law
pertinent thereto.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004877
========
LC004877 - Page 5 of 6